Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 8.1 Relocation of Utility Services

24-8.1-1.
Declaration of policy.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the services rendered by utilities owned by private corporations, private companies, municipalities, political subdivisions, authorities, or agencies of the state are necessary to the public health, welfare, and safety and that any payments made to such utilities for the costs of state initiated relocation thereof incident to the construction of highway projects on the federal aid primary or secondary systems or on the national system of interstate and defense highways, including extensions thereof, are for a public purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 148, § 1.

24-8.1-2.
Relocation of utility facilities necessitated by highway construction.

Notwithstanding any provision of law or of any charter or statute, general or special, to the contrary, whenever state-initiated relocation of utility facilities in the state, owned by private corporations, private companies, municipalities, political subdivisions, authorities, or agencies of the state, whether within or without the limits of public ways, shall become necessary in connection with a highway project on the federal aid primary or secondary systems or on the national system of interstate and defense highways, including extensions thereof, for which the state shall be entitled under any law of the United States to reimbursement from federal funds for any portion of the cost of the project, then the state may order the relocation of the utility facilities, and the private corporation, private company, municipality, political subdivision, agencies of the state, or authority owning or operating the facilities shall promptly relocate the facilities in accordance with the order and the state shall reimburse the owner of the utility or utility facility for the cost of relocation subject to the following limitations and in accordance with the following formula: for any utility facility that is to be reimbursed federally, in whole or in part, and for any utility facility that does not qualify for federal reimbursement, the division shall reimburse the owner fifty percent (50%) of the costs of relocating the utility facility; in no case shall a utility be reimbursed for any type of betterment; reimbursement is for relocation costs only; the state shall pay the cost of the relocation to the utility as part of the cost of the federally aided highway project. A utility relocation shall be eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this section only if it is completed to the satisfaction of the state within target dates established by the state and in accordance with design criteria set forth by the state for the relocation in a manner that facilitates the timely completion of the affected project. The state shall pay a reasonable amount to private corporations and private companies for the relocation of utilities commencing with highway projects that are authorized for construction after March 1, 1976.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 340, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 341, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

24-8.1-2.1.
Relocation necessitated by sewer construction.

Notwithstanding any provision of law or of any charter or statute, general or special, to the contrary, whenever the relocation of utility facilities in the state, owned by private corporations, private companies, municipalities, political subdivisions, authorities, or agencies of the state, whether within or without the limits of public ways, shall become necessary in connection with a sewer construction project, for which the state shall be entitled under any law of the United States to reimbursement from federal funds for any portion of the cost of the project, then the municipality or sewerage district commission undertaking the project may require the relocation of the utility facilities, and the private corporation, private company, municipality, political subdivision, agencies of the state, or authority owning or operating such facilities shall promptly relocate the facilities and the state shall pay the state and federal share, if eligible, of the cost of the relocation to the utility as part of the cost of the federally aided sewer construction project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 346, § 1.

24-8.1-3.
“Utility facilities” defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “utility facilities” includes the systems owned by private corporations, private companies, municipalities, political subdivisions, authorities or agencies of the state furnishing water, sewage disposal, telephone, telegraph, or other communication, electric, or gas services within this state and all plant and equipment comprised therein without regard to whether or not the furnishing of such services is subject to regulation under the provisions of title 39, provided further that all private corporations and private companies coming within the scope of this chapter shall be regulated by title 39.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 148, § 1.

24-8.1-3.1.
“As built” plans required.

Each utility shall submit to the department of transportation a complete set of “as-built” plans, within sixty (60) days of the installation of new utility facilities, or within sixty (60) days of the relocation of existing utility facilities that affect state roads.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 378, § 1.

24-8.1-4.
“Costs of relocation” defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “cost of relocation” includes the entire amount paid by the private corporations, private companies, municipality, authorities or agency of the state, or authority, properly and reasonably attributable to relocation, after deducting therefrom any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility. The amount of reimbursement for the cost of relocation shall not be reduced by any expired service life of the old facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 49, § 1.

24-8.1-5.
Public utility and other acts unaffected.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to repeal, abridge, or modify the provisions of the Public Utilities Act, compiled in title 39, or any related acts now in force.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 60.